Washington statutes.
RCW 41.44.150

Allowance on retirement for service.

(1) A member upon retirement for service, shall receive a retirement allowance subject to the provisions of subsection (2) of this section, which shall consist of:

(a) An annuity which shall be the actuarial equivalent of his or her accumulated normal contributions at the time of his or her retirement; and

(b) A pension provided by the contributions of the city, equal to the annuity purchased by the accumulated normal contributions of the member;

(c) For any member having credit for prior service an additional pension, provided by the contributions of the city, as set forth in RCW 41.44.120 at the rate selected by the city employing the member;

(d) Any member, excepting a part time employee, who has ten or more years of creditable service and who is retired by reason of attaining the age of sixty-five or over if included in the miscellaneous personnel or the age of fifty-five or over if included in the uniformed personnel, and whose retirement allowance is calculated to be less than sixty dollars per month, shall receive such additional pension, provided by the contributions of the city, as will make his or her total retirement allowance equal to sixty dollars per month. An annuity purchased by accumulated additional contributions in such case shall be paid in addition to the minimum guaranteed as herein provided. A part time employee having ten or more years of creditable service, retired by reason of attaining the ages in this subdivision specified and whose retirement allowance is calculated to be less than forty dollars per month, shall receive such additional pension, provided by the contributions of the city, as will make the total retirement allowance equal to forty dollars per month, together with an annuity purchased by his or her accumulated additional contributions, if any, in addition to the minimum guaranteed.

Nothing herein contained shall be construed in a manner to increase or to decrease any pension being paid or to be paid to a member retired prior to June 11, 1953.

(e) Any member, excepting a part time employee, who has been or is retired by reason of attaining the age of sixty-five or over if included in the miscellaneous personnel or the age of fifty-five or over if included in the uniformed personnel, and whose retirement allowance is calculated to be less than sixty dollars per month, shall receive such additional pension, provided by the contributions of the city, as will make his or her total retirement allowance equal to six dollars per month for each year of his or her creditable service: PROVIDED, That the total additional retirement allowance shall be limited to an amount equal to such amount as will make his or her total retirement allowance not more than sixty dollars per month. An annuity purchased by accumulated additional contributions, if any, in such case shall be paid in addition to the minimum guaranteed, as herein provided.

Nothing herein contained shall be construed in a manner to increase or to decrease any pension being paid or to be paid to a member retired prior to June 11, 1953.

(f) The normal retirement age for uniformed personnel shall be age fifty-five with twenty-five years of creditable service, or shall be at an age greater than age fifty-five upon the completion of twenty-five years or more of creditable service. Upon retirement at the normal age, the retirement allowance shall be equal to fifty percent of final compensation. If retirement occurs at an age other than the normal age, the retirement allowance shall be the same proportion of fifty percent of final compensation as the member's actual years of service bears to the years of service that were or would have been served up to the normal retirement age: PROVIDED, That if retirement occurs prior to the normal age of retirement, said allowance shall be the actuarial equivalent of said allowance at the normal age of retirement.

Nothing herein contained shall be construed in a manner to increase or to decrease any pension being paid or to be paid to a member retired prior to August 6, 1965.

(2) If the retirement allowance of the member as provided in this section, is in excess of three-fourths of his or her final compensation, the pension of the member, purchased by the contributions of the city, shall be reduced to such an amount as shall make the member's retirement allowance equal to three-fourths of his or her final compensation, except as provided in subdivision (3) of this section.

(3) A member, upon retirement from service, shall receive in addition to the retirement allowance provided in this section, an additional annuity which shall be the actuarial equivalent of any accumulated additional contributions which he or she has to his or her credit at the time of his or her retirement.

[ 2012 c 117 s 68; 1965 ex.s. c 99 s 5; 1961 c 227 s 6; 1957 c 158 s 4; 1953 c 228 s 6; 1951 c 275 s 11; 1949 c 171 s 5; 1947 c 71 s 15; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 9592-144.]